Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2006
Niobrara scenic river corridor, defined.

For purposes of the Niobrara Scenic River Act, Niobrara scenic river corridor means the area designated as a national scenic river and a part of the national wild and scenic rivers system under 16 U.S.C. 1274(a)(117), as such section existed on May 24, 1991, and described in the 1996 Niobrara National Scenic River General Management Plan/Environmental Impact Statement.

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 43.